da: Sundhed og skønhed > Personlig pleje > Barbering og personlig pleje > Tilbehør til hårklippere og trimmere: Påsætningskamme og værn; Opladningsstativer og kabler; Klippemaskine – smøremidler og vedligeholdelses-sprays; Hårklippemaskine – rengøringsbørster
nl: Gezondheid en persoonlijke verzorging > Persoonlijke verzorging > Scheren en gezichtsbeharing > Accessoires voor tondeuses: Opzetkammen en beschermers; Oplaadstations en kabels; Tondeuse smeermiddelen en onderhoudsprays; Haar tondeuse reinigingsborstels
sk-SK: Zdravie a krása > Osobná starostlivosť > Pomôcky na holenie a zastrihávanie brady a fúzov > Príslušenstvo pre strihacie strojčeky a zastrihávače brady a fúzov: Nadstavce a kryty; Nabíjacie stojany a káble; Mazivá a údržbové spreje na strojčeky; Čistiace kefky na strojčeky
zh-CN: 保健/美容/卫生/护理 > 个人护理 > 剃须/美容 > 电推剪和理发器配件: 限位梳和护罩; 充电座和线缆; 理发器润滑剂和保养喷雾; 理发器清洁刷
fr: Santé et beauté > Hygiène personnelle > Rasage et soins > Accessoires pour tondeuses et coupe-cheveux: Sabots et guides de coupe; Supports de charge et câbles de recharge; Lubrifiants et sprays d’entretien pour tondeuses; Brosses de nettoyage pour tondeuses
sv: Skönhet och hälsa > Personlig vård > Rakning och ansning > Tillbehör till hårklippare och trimmers: Tillsatskammar och skydd; Laddningsstativ och kablar; Klippmaskinsmörjmedel och underhållssprayer; Rengöringsborstar för hårklippare
es: Salud y belleza > Cuidado personal > Afeitado y arreglo personal > Accesorios para recortadores y cortadores de pelo: Peines de sujeción y guías; Soportes de carga y cables; Lubricantes y aerosoles de mantenimiento de cortadora; Cepillos de limpieza de cortadora de cabello
el: Υγεία & ομορφιά > Προσωπική φροντίδα > Ξύρισμα & περιποίηση > Αξεσουάρ για κουρευτικές μηχανές & ξυριστικές μηχανές: Χτένες και προστατευτικά; Βάσεις φόρτισης και καλώδια; Λιπαντικά και σπρέι συντήρησης κουρευτικής μηχανής; Βουρτσάκια καθαρισμού κουρευτικής μηχανής
lt-LT: Sveikata ir grožis > Asmeninė priežiūra > Skutimasis ir barzdos bei ūsų priežiūra > Plaukų kirpimo mašinėlių ir kirptukų priedai: Antgalių šukos ir apsaugos; Įkrovimo stovai ir laidai; Plaukų kirpimo mašinėlių tepalai ir priežiūros purškalai; Plaukų kirpimo mašinėlių valymo šepetėliai
de: Gesundheit & Schönheit > Körperpflege > Rasieren & Trimmen > Zubehör für Haarschneidegeräte & Trimmer: Aufsetzkämme & Schutzkämme; Ladeständer & Kabel; Schermaschinen-Schmiermittel & -Pflegesprays; Reinigungsbürsten für Haarschneidemaschinen
pl: Zdrowie i uroda > Higiena osobista > Golenie i strzyżenie > Akcesoria do trymerów do włosów: Nasadki grzebieniowe i osłony; Stojaki/stacje ładujące i kable; Smary i spraye konserwujące do maszynek; Szczoteczki do czyszczenia maszynek do włosów
ro-RO: Sănătate și frumusețe > Îngrijire personală > Bărbierit și îngrijire > Accesorii pentru mașini de tuns și scurtat: Piepteni și protecții atașabile; Suporturi și cabluri de încărcare; Lubrifianți și sprayuri de întreținere pentru mașini de tuns; Perii de curățare pentru mașini de tuns
hr-HR: Zdravlje i ljepota > Osobna njega > Brijanje i uređivanje > Dodaci za mašinice za šišanje i trimere: Nastavni češljevi i štitnici; Postolja za punjenje i kablovi; Maziva i sprejevi za održavanje mašinica; Četkice za čišćenje mašinica
vi: Sức khỏe và sắc đẹp > Sản phẩm chăm sóc cá nhân > Chăm sóc ngoại hình > Phụ kiện tông đơ cắt tóc: Lược gắn và bộ phận bảo vệ; Đế sạc và dây cáp; Dầu bôi trơn và xịt bảo dưỡng tông đơ; Bàn chải làm sạch tông đơ
zh-TW: 保健與美容 > 個人保養 > 刮鬍修容 > 理髮/修髮器配件: 附加梳及護板; 充電座及纜線; 剪刀潤滑油及保養噴霧; 理髮器清潔刷
it: Salute e bellezza > Cura della persona > Insaponatura e rasatura > Accessori per tagliacapelli e tagliabasette: Pettini e protezioni di attacco; Supporti di ricarica e cavi; Lubrificanti e spray di manutenzione del trimmer; Spazzole di pulizia del trimmer per capelli
ko: 건강/미용 > 개인 미용/위생 용품 > 면도/체모 손질 > 이발기 부대용품: 어태치먼트 빗 및 가드; 충전 스탠드 및 케이블; 클리퍼 윤활유 및 유지 관리 스프레이; 헤어 클리퍼 청소 브러시
ru: Красота и здоровье > Личная гигиена и уход за собой > Бритье и удаление волос > Аксессуары для триммеров и машинок для стрижки волос: Насадки-расчески и защитные насадки; Зарядные подставки и кабели; Смазки и спреи для обслуживания машинок; Щетки для чистки машинок для стрижки волос
sl-SI: Zdravje in lepota > Osebna nega > Britje in urejanje > Dodatki za strižnike in prirezovalnike za dlake: Nastavki in zaščitni glavniki; Polnilna stojala in kabli; Maziva in vzdrževalna razpršila za strižnike; Krtačke za čiščenje strižnikov
bg-BG: Здраве и красота > Лична грижа > Бръснене и подстригване > Аксесоари за машинки за подстригване и тримери: Приставки и предпазители за машинка за подстригване; Зарядни стойки и кабели; Смазки и спрейове за поддръжка на машинка; Четки за почистване на машинка за подстригване
cs: Zdraví a krása > Osobní péče > Holení a péče o vzhled > Strojky na stříhání vlasů – příslušenství: Nasazovací hřebeny a ochranné nástavce; Nabíjecí stojany a kabely; Maziva a udržovací spreje na strojky; Čisticí kartáčky na zastřihovače vlasů
pt-PT: Saúde e beleza > Cuidado pessoal > Depilação e barbear > Acessórios de máquinas de cortar o cabelo: Pentes e guias de encaixe; Suportes de carregamento e cabos; Lubrificantes e sprays de manutenção para máquinas; Escovas de limpeza para máquinas de cortar cabelo
th: สุขภาพและความงาม > ผลิตภัณฑ์ดูแลส่วนบุคคล > การโกนหนวดและการเสริมสวย > อุปกรณ์ตัดแต่งขนและผม: หวีและแผ่นรองสำหรับใบมีด; แท่นชาร์จและสายชาร์จ; น้ำมันหล่อลื่นและสเปรย์บำรุงรักษา; แปรงทำความสะอาดปัตตาเลี่ยน
en: Health & Beauty > Personal Care > Shaving & Grooming > Hair Clipper & Trimmer Accessories: Attachment Combs & Guards; Charging Stands & Cables; Clipper Lubricants & Maintenance Sprays; Hair Clipper Cleaning Brushes
fi: Terveys ja kauneus > Henkilökohtainen hygienia > Karvanpoisto ja parranajo > Hiustenleikkauskoneiden ja trimmerien lisätarvikkeet: Kiinnitettävät leikkuukammat ja suojat; Latausteline ja -kaapeli; Leikkurin voitelu- ja huoltosuihke; Hiustenleikkuukoneen puhdistusharja
nb: Skjønnhet og helse > Personlig pleie > Barbering og kroppspleie > Tilbehør til hårklippere og -trimmere: Avtagbare kammer og vern; Ladestativer og kabler; Smøremidler og vedlikeholdsspray til hårklippere; Hårklipper-rensebørster
tr: Sağlık ve Güzellik > Kişisel Bakım > Tıraş ve Kişisel Bakım > Saç Kesme ve Düzeltme Makinesi Aksesuarları: Ataşman Taraklar ve Koruyucular; Şarj Stantları ve Kablolar; Tıraş Makinesi Yağlayıcıları ve Bakım Spreyler; Saç Kesme Makinesi Temizleme Fırçaları
pt-BR: Saúde e beleza > Cuidados pessoais > Barbearia e embelezamento > Acessórios para aparadores de cabelo: Pentes e protetores de encaixe; Suportes e cabos de carregamento; Lubrificantes e sprays de manutenção para cortador; Escovas de limpeza para cortador de cabelo
hu: Egészség és szépség > Személyes gondoskodás > Borotválkozás és ápolás > Hajvágó és trimmer-kiegészítők: Tartozékfésűk és -védők; Töltőállványok és -kábelek; Hajnyíró kenőanyagok és karbantartó spray-k; Hajnyíró tisztítókefék
ja: 美容・健康 > 衛生日用品 > シェービング・脱毛 > バリカン・鼻毛カッター関連用品: アタッチメントコームとガード; 充電スタンドとケーブル; クリッパー潤滑剤とメンテナンススプレー; ヘアクリッパー清掃ブラシ